Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1013
Assistance to the aged, blind, and disabled; not vested right; not assignable; exemption from levy.

No person shall have any vested right to any claim against the county or state for assistance of any kind by virtue of being or having been a recipient of assistance to the aged, blind or disabled, aid to dependent children, or medical assistance for the aged. No such assistance shall be alienable by assignment or transfer, or be subject to attachment, garnishment or any other legal process.

Laws 1965, c. 394, § 1, p. 1261.